Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.51
Original capitol furniture; inventory.

The Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission shall establish and maintain an inventory of all original furniture including, but not limited to, its style, type, condition, location, and assignment.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 28.